Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 15. Municipal and County Funds to Support the Arts

§ 39-15-1.
Authority of municipal and county government to expend general fund monies in support of the arts.

The governing authorities of any municipality or county are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to expend monies from the municipal or county general fund to match any other funds available for the purpose of supporting the development, promotion and coordination of the arts within such municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 496, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1986).